Georgia, session 2025_26, HB137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 10 of Title 13 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to contracts for
public works, is amended in Code Section 13-10-80, relating to definitions, contract
requirements, application, effect of greater benefits contracted for, and evidence of
indebtedness paid, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
"(c) This Code section shall not apply to:
(1) Any contracts let by the Department of Transportation of this state for the
construction, improvement, or maintenance of roads or highways in this state or purposes
incidental thereto; or
(2) Any contracts whose value or duration at the time of the award does not exceed
$150,000.00 $250,000.00 or 45 days in duration."
SECTION 2.
Article 10 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
contracts and purchases by public schools, is amended in Code Section 20-2-500, relating
to contracts for purchases authorized of certain supplies, materials, equipment, or agricultural
products to give preference to in-state manufacturers or producers, purchases over
$100,000.00, and vendor preferences, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a)(1) Local boards of education shall provide that contracts for or purchases of
supplies, materials, equipment, or agricultural products, including but not limited to
school buses but not including instructional materials or beverages for immediate
consumption, for public elementary and secondary schools supported in whole or in part
H. B. 137
- 2 -

LC 47 3227/AP
from public funds shall give preference as far as may be reasonable and practicable to
such supplies, materials, equipment, and agricultural products as may be manufactured
or produced in this state. Such preference shall not sacrifice quality.
(2) Local boards of education shall provide that, in determining whether such a
preference is reasonable in any case where the value of a contract for or purchase of such
supplies, materials, equipment, or agricultural products exceeds $100,000.00
$250,000.00, the local school district shall consider, among other factors, information
submitted by the bidder which may include the bidder's estimate of the multiplier effect
on gross state domestic product and the effect on public revenues of the state and the
effect on public revenues of political subdivisions resulting from acceptance of a bid or
offer to sell Georgia manufactured or produced goods as opposed to out-of-state
manufactured or produced goods. Any such estimates shall be in writing. No local
school district shall divide a contract or purchase which exceeds $100,000.00
$250,000.00 for the purpose of avoiding the requirements of this paragraph."
SECTION 3.
Article 11 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
public school property and facilities, is amended in Code Section 20-2-520, relating to
acquiring and disposing of school sites and building, repairing, renting, and furnishing
schoolhouses, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) The county boards of education shall have the power to purchase, lease, or rent school
sites; build, repair, or rent schoolhouses; purchase maps, globes, and school furniture; and
make all arrangements necessary to the efficient operation of the schools. Such county
boards are invested with the title, care, and custody of all schoolhouses or other property,
with the power to control such property in such manner as they think will best serve the
interests of the public schools; and when, in the opinion of the county board, any
schoolhouse site has become unnecessary or inconvenient, they may sell it in the name of
H. B. 137
- 3 -

LC 47 3227/AP
the county board; and the conveyance for any such sale shall be executed by the president
or secretary of the county board, according to the order of the county board. Such county
boards shall have the power to receive any gift, grant, donation, or devise made for the use
of the public schools within the respective counties; and all conveyances of real estate
which may be made to such a county board shall vest the property in such county board and
its successors in office. Such county board may provide for the building of schoolhouses
by a tax on all property located in the county and outside the territorial limits of any
independent school system. The construction of all public school buildings must be
approved by the county school superintendent and county board and must be according to
the plans furnished by the county school authorities and the State Board of Education. All
public school construction contracts in excess of $100,000.00 $250,000.00 shall be publicly
advertised and awarded through an open and competitive process, regardless of the funding
source."
SECTION 4.
Chapter 4 of Title 32 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state, county, and
municipal road systems, is amended revising Code Section 32-4-63, relating to limitations
on power to contract and at least two estimates required for certain expenditures, as follows:
"32-4-63.
(a) A county is prohibited from negotiating a contract except a contract:
(1) Involving the expenditure of less than $200,000.00 $250,000.00;
(2) With a state agency or county or municipality with which a county is authorized to
contract in accordance with the provisions of Code Sections 32-4-61 and 32-4-62;
(3) For the purchase of those materials, supplies, and equipment necessary for the
county's construction and maintenance of its public roads and for the support and
maintenance of the county's forces used in such work, as authorized by Chapter 91 of
Title 36;
H. B. 137
- 4 -

LC 47 3227/AP
(4) Subject to Article 6 of Chapter 6 of this title, with a railroad or railway company or
a publicly or privately owned utility concerning relocation of its line, tracks, or facilities
where the same are not then located in a public road and such relocation or
grade-crossing elimination is necessary as an incident to the construction of a new public
road or to the reconstruction or maintenance of an existing public road. Nothing
contained in this paragraph shall be construed as requiring a county to furnish a site or
100 right of way for railroad or railway lines or tracks of public utility facilities required to
101 be removed from a public road;
102 (5) For engineering or other kinds of professional or specialized services;
103 (6) For emergency maintenance requiring immediate repairs to a public road, including
104 but not limited to bridge repairs, snow and ice removal, and repairs due to flood
105 conditions;
106 (7) Otherwise expressly authorized by law; or
107 (8) That is a design-build contract as provided for in Code Section 32-4-74.
108 (b) No contract involving an expenditure of more than $20,000.00 but less than
109 $200,000.00 $250,000.00 shall be awarded under this Code section without the submission
110 of at least two estimates."
111 SECTION 5.
112 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 32-4-113, relating to limitations
113 on power to contract and at least two estimates required for certain expenditures, as follows:
114 "32-4-113.
115 (a) A municipality is prohibited from negotiating a contract except a contract:
116 (1) Involving the expenditure of less than $200,000.00 $250,000.00;
117 (2) With a state agency or political subdivision as authorized by Code Sections 32-4-111
118 and 32-4-112;
H. B. 137
- 5 -

LC 47 3227/AP
119 (3) With a railroad or railway company or a publicly or privately owned utility as
120 authorized by Article 6 of Chapter 6 of this title;
121 (4) For engineering or other kinds of professional or specialized services;
122 (5) For emergency maintenance requiring immediate repairs to a public road, including
123 but not limited to bridge repairs, snow and ice removal, and repairs due to flood
124 conditions; or
125 (6) Otherwise expressly authorized by law.
126 (b) No contract involving an expenditure of more than $20,000.00 but less than
127 $200,000.00 $250,000.00 shall be awarded under this Code section without the submission
128 of at least two estimates."
129 SECTION 6.
130 Chapter 91 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to public works
131 bidding, is amended in Code Section 36-91-22, relating to exceptions, use of inmate labor,
132 and emergency situations, by revising subsections (a) and (g) as follows:
133 "(a) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to public works construction projects,
134 when the same can be performed at a cost of less than $100,000.00 $250,000.00. Public
135 works construction projects shall not be subdivided in an effort to evade the provisions of
136 this chapter."
137 "(g) The requirements of this chapter shall not apply to public works construction projects
138 or any portion of a public works construction project self-performed by a governmental
139 entity. If the governmental entity contracts with a private person or entity for a portion of
140 such project, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to any such contract estimated to
141 exceed $100,000.00 $250,000.00."
H. B. 137
- 6 -

LC 47 3227/AP
142 SECTION 7.
143 Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
144 relating to general authority, duties, and procedure for state purchasing, is amended in Code
145 Section 50-5-72, relating to construction and public works contracts conducted by
146 department, advertising costs, and exceptions, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
147 "(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part or any other law dealing with the
148 subject matter contained in this Code section to the contrary, all construction or public
149 works contracts, exceeding a total expenditure of $100,000.00 $250,000.00, of any
150 department, board, bureau, commission, office, or agency of the state government, except
151 as provided in this Code section, shall be conducted and negotiated by the Department of
152 Administrative Services in accordance with this part; provided, however, that any
153 expenditure of less than $100,000.00 $250,000.00 shall still be subject to review and
154 approval by the Department of Administrative Services, which may approve
155 noncompetitive expenditures of up to $100,000.00 $250,000.00."
156 SECTION 8.
157 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 137
- 7 -